Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 1

General Provisions

41-1-101. State prisons — Penitentiary defined — Correctional facilities.

The penitentiary located upon the farm purchased by the state from M. S. Cockrill, near Nashville in Davidson County, is the state prison, in which convicts sentenced to imprisonment in the penitentiary shall be confined, employed and governed, as provided in this title; but they may be confined and employed in branch prisons as authorized by law.

“Penitentiary” means and includes the Tennessee state penitentiary in Nashville, Brushy Mountain penitentiary, Fort Pillow state farm and the other penal institutions, reformatories, branches and facilities that may hereafter be acquired, built, constructed or maintained by the state for the purpose of confinement of persons, both male or female, who have been convicted of violating the criminal laws of this state and sentenced to imprisonment in the penitentiary.

The state regional correctional facility located in Bledsoe County is designated, and shall hereafter be known, as the “Southeastern Tennessee State Regional Correctional Facility.”

The state special needs correctional facility located in the River Bend area of Davidson County is designated, and shall hereafter be known, as the “Lois M. DeBerry Special Needs Facility.”

Code 1858, § 5436; Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 2; Shan., § 7453; mod. Code 1932, § 12062; Acts 1963, ch. 180, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-101; Acts 1985, ch. 7, § 1; 1992, ch. 746, § 1.

Cross-References. Administration of department of correction institutions, title 4, ch. 6, part 1.

Compensation of law enforcement officers for injury or death, title 7, ch. 51, part 2.

Erection of prisons authorized, Tenn. Const., art. I, § 32.

Regional state workhouses, title 41, ch. 1, part 6.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Pardon and Parole, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Liability of State Officials and Prison Corporations for Excessive Use of Force Against Inmates of Private Prisons, 40 Vand. L. Rev. 983 (1987).

The Court in Action: A summary of key cases from the U.S. Supreme Court 2000-2001 (Perry A. Craft and Arshad (Paku) Khan), 37 No. 9 Tenn. B.J. 18 (2001).

41-1-102. Administration of correctional system — Personnel — Searches of employees for contraband.

The chief officer for the government and control of the institutions and personnel of the department of correction shall be the commissioner of that department, who shall appoint, with the approval of the governor, a competent professional staff of employees as necessary to operate the state correctional system for adults in accordance with principles and standards accepted in the professional field of corrections.

The commissioner has the authority to appoint, control, dismiss or discharge employees of the department, subject to the approval of the governor.

All employees of the department shall be subject to the orders and control of the commissioner and the rules and regulations as may be adopted by the commissioner.

Periodic routine searches for contraband shall be made of all employees of the department prior to the entrance of the persons inside the confines of a state correctional facility. The searches may be accomplished through the use of dogs trained to detect controlled substances and controlled substance analogues, by the use of a magnetometer or similar device, by a pat-down search by a person of the same sex and by an examination of the contents of pockets, bags, purses, packages or other containers. The searches shall be conducted uniformly or by systematic random selection.

Any strip search or other body search more intrusive than as provided in subdivision (d)(1) may be made only on the basis of a reasonable suspicion, based on specific objective facts and reasonable inferences drawn from those facts in light of experience, that the employee to be searched is then in possession of contraband. The search is to be made only on the express authority of the highest officer present in the institution, made by one of the same sex in a private setting; and the specific objective facts shall be disclosed to the employee before the search authorized by this subdivision (d)(2) is conducted and shall be reduced to writing and preserved.

If contraband is found on an employee pursuant to a search authorized by either subdivision (d)(1) or (d)(2), the employee may be required to submit to an official polygraph examination. Employees of the department of correction may not be disciplined or discharged solely on the basis that they failed a polygraph examination or solely for refusing to take a polygraph examination.

The department is authorized to promulgate necessary rules and regulations pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement this subsection (d). The rules shall provide detailed guidelines and standards for the manner in which the searches authorized by this subsection (d) shall be conducted, the manner and conditions under which any polygraph examinations authorized by this subsection (d) shall be conducted and the types and extent of disciplinary action, if any, that may be taken pursuant to this subsection (d).

One (1) dog trained to detect controlled substances and controlled substance analogues for each grand division and one (1) polygraph machine for each grand division shall be utilized by the department for the purposes of implementing this subsection (d).

Acts 1889, ch. 204, §§ 20, 26; impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, §§ 5, 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 3, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, §§ 2, 5, 9, 12, 42; Shan., §§ 7454, 7499; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 19, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 2-5, 42, 43, 60; mod. Code 1932, §§ 12063, 12095; modified; Acts 1972, ch. 576, §§ 1, 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-102, 41-112; Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 10, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, § 53; 2010, ch. 810, § 1; 2012, ch. 848, § 36.

Cross-References. Administration of institutions, title 4, ch. 6.

Commissioner of corrections, powers and duties, §§ 4-3-602 — 4-3-604.

Counselors in educational and correctional institutions, qualifications, § 8-50-105.

Department of correction, powers and duties, §§ 4-3-606, 4-6-102.

Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Wardens and superintendents, §§ 4-6-103 — 4-6-108.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Pardon and Parole, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Sex in Prison (Ronald G. Turner), 36 No. 8 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2000).

41-1-103. Oath of officers and employees.

All officers and other persons so employed to control and manage the penitentiary for the state shall, before entering upon the discharge of their duties, take and subscribe the following oath:

I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will fully, faithfully, impartially, and diligently perform all the duties required of me as in the penitentiary; that I will execute the laws and regulations prescribed for the government of the institution, so far as concerns my office; that I will accept no bribe, or other compensation during my continuance in office, other than such compensation as is allowed by law; and that I will, on no occasion, ill treat or abuse any convict under my care, beyond the punishment ordered by law, or the rules and regulations of the institution.

The oaths of the assistant or deputy commissioners, wardens and superintendents shall be filed with the secretary of state. The oaths of all other employees shall be filed with the commissioner of correction.

The violation of this oath by any of the officers or employees shall be perjury, punishable as in other cases of perjury.

Code 1858, § 5453; Acts 1871, ch. 94, § 8; impl. am. Acts 1883, ch. 171, § 20; Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 9; Shan., § 7461; mod. Code 1932, § 12064; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-103; Acts 1984, ch. 659, § 1.

Cross-References. Official misconduct, § 39-16-402.

Perjury, title 39, ch. 16, part 7.

41-1-104. Warden — Duties.

The warden has the charge and custody of the penitentiary, with the land, buildings, tools, implements and every other species of property within the precincts of the penitentiary, or appertaining to the penitentiary, under the direction and control of the commissioner of correction.

The custody, welfare, conduct and safekeeping of the inmates shall be the responsibility of the warden, who will examine into the affairs of the institution daily to assure that proper standards are maintained.

Code 1858, §§ 5466, 5467; Shan., §§ 7486, 7487; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, §§ 12081, 12082; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; Acts 1972, ch. 576, § 2; Acts 1980, ch. 755, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-104 — 41-106; Acts 1990, ch. 942, § 2.

Cross-References. Wardens and superintendents, §§ 4-6-103 — 4-6-108.

41-1-105. Reports to commissioner.

The commissioner may require stated reports, in writing, from the warden, physician and other officers as to the condition of the establishment and its inmates.

Code 1858, § 5456 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 12); impl. am. Acts 1871, ch. 94, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, §§ 9, 12; Shan., § 7470; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 3, 42, 60; Code 1932, § 12066; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-116.

Cross-References. Administration of department of correction institutions, title 4, ch. 6, part 1.

41-1-106. Visits by commissioner.

The commissioner or the commissioner's agent shall, once a month, or more often if the person thinks it necessary, visit the penitentiary for the purpose of determining whether the laws, rules and regulations relative to the operation and maintenance of the penitentiary are duly observed, and the officers are competent, vigilant and faithful and the inmates properly governed.

Code 1858, § 5458 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 12); impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 9; Shan., § 7472; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 3, 42, 60; Code 1932, § 12067; Acts 1980, ch. 913, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-117.

41-1-107. Examination of witnesses.

The commissioner of correction is authorized to summon any witness or witnesses to appear before the commissioner to testify under oath in regard to any matter touching or relative to either the main state penitentiary or branch prisons.

The commissioner is given the right to administer the oath to all the witnesses so summoned, or the witnesses may be sworn before any officer authorized by law to administer oaths.

Acts 1909, ch. 535, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, §§ 9, 12; Shan., § 7581a1; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, § 12180; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-118.

41-1-108. Insurance on property.

The buildings, shops and other property belonging to the state, connected with the penitentiary, may be insured by the commissioner.

Acts 1889, ch. 204, § 30; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, §§ 9, 12; Shan., § 7473; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; mod. Code 1932, § 12068; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-119.

41-1-109. Repairs and improvements.

The warden may, with the consent and advice of the commissioner of correction, make repairs and improvements and build additional cells, as may be necessary, using for those purposes the labor of the inmates as far as practicable.

Code 1858, § 5468; impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, §§ 9, 12; Shan., § 7488; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, § 12083; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-120.

Cross-References. Labor of inmates, § 41-1-402.

Work programs, title 41, ch. 22.

41-1-110. Funds — Accounting — Collections — Expenditures — Surplus.

It is the duty of the warden to keep a correct account of all moneys received or disbursed by the warden for the penitentiary and to lay before the commissioner of correction, monthly, a detailed statement thereof.

The warden of the Tennessee state penitentiary and the warden of the Brushy Mountain penitentiary shall transmit on or before Monday of each week to the state treasurer all the moneys collected by them from every source and shall forward to the commissioner a detailed statement of the collections.

The state treasurer shall credit the moneys received to separate accounts kept in the name of the institution.

The funds deposited may be used by the commissioner for the payment of duly authorized purchases of supplies, goods, wares, merchandise and produce used in the maintenance or operation of the institutions, for the payment of salaries, wages and compensation of employees, for the purchase of livestock and equipment for the farms and for new machinery, for machinery repairs, for building and for building repairs and for all necessary and legitimate expenses connected with or incident to the operation of these institutions.

Any new building or new equipment that will exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) in cost shall be authorized in writing by the commissioner before the expenditures can be made.

Only the surplus after payment of all salaries, wages and expenses shall pass into the general funds of the state and be available for its debts, expenses and uses.

Code 1858, § 5469 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 18); impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 9; Shan., § 7489; Acts 1919, ch. 30, § 24; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 5; Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 24; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Shan. Supp. §§ 312b44-312b47; Code 1932, §§ 413-416; 12084; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-121 — 41-125.

Cross-References. Administration of correctional institutions, funds, §§ 4-6-116 — 4-6-134.

41-1-111. Preservation of records.

All registers, returns and other documents relating to the affairs of the penitentiary are public documents and shall remain in the penitentiary. The warden shall preserve official copies of the warden's correspondence with the governor, commissioner of correction or other public officers and of any official communication the warden may receive from them.

Code 1858, § 5476; impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, §§ 9, 12; Shan., § 7492; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, § 12087; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-126.

41-1-112. Actions by commissioner.

The commissioner is authorized to sue and to prosecute suits in the commissioner's own name as the commissioner, with reference to all matters pertaining to the penitentiary affairs of the state at the main prison, for the enforcement of all contracts made by the commissioner or by the commissioner's authority, for the collection of all debts or demands due the department of correction and to protect the property of the state in the commissioner's charge in the department.

The commissioner is authorized to sue and to prosecute suits:

For the collection of all demands due on account of the Brushy Mountain Coal Mines to enforce all contracts made with the commissioner in the name of the Brushy Mountain Coal Mines;

To protect the Brushy Mountain Coal Mines and coal lands, the improvements upon the Brushy Mountain Coal Mines and coal lands and all property in the commissioner's charge in the department; and

As to any and all matters growing out of the state coal mining enterprise.

These suits shall be brought and prosecuted in the commissioner's own name or in the name of the Brushy Mountain Coal Mines.

Acts 1903, ch. 278, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 9; Shan., §§ 7474a1, 7474a2; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; mod. Code 1932, §§ 12070, 12071; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-127, 41-128.

41-1-113. Report to governor.

The commissioner shall report to the governor, forthwith, all violations of law or omissions or neglect of duty by the warden or other officers and employees about the penitentiary.

Code 1858, § 5459; impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 9; Shan., § 7476; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; mod. Code 1932, § 12074; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-130.

41-1-114. Report to general assembly.

The commissioner shall transmit to the general assembly, at each regular session of that body and during the first week of the session, a report in full of the transactions of the penitentiary during the two (2) years preceding the report, and showing, among other things:

The number of inmates confined in the penitentiary;

The offenses for which committed;

Their ages, previous occupation, birth place and residence;

Their respective periods of imprisonment;

The different kinds of businesses in which they are employed;

How many employed in each; and

The profit or loss.

Code 1858, § 5460 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 13); impl. am. Acts 1883, ch. 171, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 9; Shan., § 7477; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, § 12075; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-131.

Cross-References. Administration of department of correction institutions, title 4, ch. 6, part 1.

Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

41-1-115. Persons authorized to possess otherwise prohibited items.

The warden or superintendent of each state penal or correctional institution shall post in a conspicuous place in the institution and shall keep up to date a list of the names of guards, employees and other persons authorized to have in their possession while upon the grounds of the institution any of the contraband items listed in § 39-16-201(b)(1), together with a complete description of the item or items the persons are authorized to have in their possession.

When and if the warden or superintendent authorizes any person not on the posted list to have possession, while upon the grounds of the institution, of any contraband item listed in § 39-16-201(b)(1), the superintendent shall provide the person with written authorization.

Acts 1961, ch. 143, § 2; T.C.A., § 41-133.

Cross-References. Controlled substances, title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

41-1-116. Qualifications of correction officers.

Any person employed as a correctional officer by the department of correction shall:

Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Be a citizen of the United States;

Be a high school graduate or its equivalent as determined by the board of control of the Tennessee corrections institute;

Have fingerprints on file with the Tennessee bureau of investigation;

Have passed a physical examination by a licensed physician;

Have a good moral character as determined by investigation;

Have been certified by a Tennessee licensed health care provider qualified in the psychiatric or psychological field as being free from any impairment, as set forth in the current edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM) of the American Psychiatric Association at the time of the examination, that would, in the professional judgment of the examiner, affect the applicant's ability to perform any essential function of the job, with or without a reasonable accommodation; and

Have successfully completed appropriate basic training at the Tennessee corrections institute as prescribed by the board of control of the institute. This requirement must be met within six (6) months from the initial date of employment. An extension of this time period may be granted to present correctional employees by the board of control of the institute. The employees shall also complete appropriate refresher courses each year as prescribed by the board of control of the institute.

Acts 1976, ch. 825, § 2; T.C.A., § 41-136; Acts 1991, ch. 276, § 1; 2013, ch. 137, § 5.

Cross-References. Duties of Tennessee corrections institute, § 41-7-103.

Temporary retention of disabled correctional officer or youth service worker, § 4-6-148.

41-1-117. Retaking of prisoners absconding from work release or violating furlough agreements.

The commissioner of correction may issue a warrant to retake any prisoner sentenced to the state penitentiary who has absconded while on a work release program or violated the condition of that prisoner's furlough agreement. The warrant shall not be bondable.

Upon proper showing by the department that a prisoner was released in error, the sentencing judge or the judge in the county from which the individual was released may issue a warrant for the retaking of the prisoner. The warrant may be acted upon by those employees of the department of correction designated by the commissioner who have been trained in the use of firearms and are vested with the powers and authority of law enforcement officers pursuant to § 4-3-609. The warrant may also be acted upon by any law enforcement officer authorized to make arrests. The warrant shall not be bondable.

Acts 1977, ch. 72, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-137; Acts 2015, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross-References. Arrest warrants, title 40, ch. 6, part 2.

Bail, title 40, ch. 11.

County workhouse work release programs, § 41-2-149.

Eligibility for work release program, § 40-35-213.

Work release programs for inmates, § 41-21-510.

41-1-118. Dogs for detecting drugs.

The commissioner of correction may maintain at least one (1) dog trained to detect marijuana and other illicit substances at each correctional facility in the commissioner's charge; but where more than one (1) correctional facility is located within a county, the commissioner may maintain one (1) dog to serve in the several facilities if this appears to the commissioner to be adequate to locate and detect the substances.

These dogs may be used on a regular basis, or at irregular times and intervals, to survey inmates and areas inhabited or frequented by inmates in order to locate and detect marijuana and other illicit substances. The dogs may also be used to check persons entering into correctional facilities or their grounds to detect the introduction of marijuana and other illicit substances.

Acts 1983, ch. 120, § 1.

Cross-References. Controlled substances, title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

State assistance in acquiring dogs, § 4-3-610.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

41-1-119. Urinalysis drug screening program.

A urinalysis drug screening program shall be established within the department of correction. Every thirty (30) days, a urine sample shall be taken from each of twenty-five (25) prison inmates selected at random who are confined in each state correctional institution; and a urinalysis shall be performed to determine the presence of drugs. A positive result shall be investigated by the department to determine whether the result emanated from the prison inmate's use of legally prescribed medicine or whether it resulted from the use of illegal drugs.

The commissioner has the authority to promulgate necessary rules and regulations to implement this section pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. These rules shall provide detailed guidelines and standards for the manner in which the urine samples are taken and the manner in which the investigations required by this section are conducted.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 1; 1993, ch. 141, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 41-1-120.

Cross-References. Controlled substances, title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

41-1-120. Improvement of penitentiary at Petros.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, it is the highest priority that the penitentiary at Petros be improved, renovated or rebuilt as necessary to make the institution suitable for use as a time-building institution to house maximum security inmates, primarily, and also medium security or other inmates. The institution shall be named the Brushy Mountain State Penitentiary and shall be the primary maximum security prison designed to house the highest security risk inmates in the system.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 47; T.C.A., § 41-1-121.

41-1-121. Drug testing of certain personnel.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commissioner of correction has the authority to require security personnel employed by the department of correction to submit to drug tests. If the result of the initial test is positive, the department shall administer a different reliable confirmatory test for the purpose of determining whether the employee is using, or has used in the immediate past twenty-four (24) hours, a controlled substance or controlled substance analogue that caused impairment of the employee's work performance.

Before the commissioner can require any employee to submit to the drug tests authorized by subsection (a), the commissioner must have a reasonable suspicion based upon specific objective facts that the employee's faculties are impaired on the job and the impairment presents a clear and present danger to the physical safety of the employee, another employee or the security of the institution. The specific objective facts shall be provided to the employee in writing prior to requiring tests. The employee subject to the tests shall be given the opportunity to explain the occurrence of suspicious behavior, and a viable explanation shall vitiate the requirement that the employee submit to the tests.

If the results of the drug tests are confirmed pursuant to subsection (a), the employee shall be provided a copy of the tests results, including confirmatory tests. All test results, including screening and confirmatory tests, must be reviewed by a qualified individual meeting certification requirements of a recognized board of toxicology. All test results shall identify the specific drugs or metabolites tested and found, whether positive or negative. The commissioner shall require precautionary measures to ensure the confidentiality of all testing information and results and shall not release any testing information to anyone other than the tested employee without written permission of the tested employee. The commissioner shall ensure that the testing of controlled substances and controlled substance analogues shall not be used to test for any other medical or bodily condition. The commissioner shall provide the tested employee a reasonable opportunity to rebut or explain the test results.

If confirmatory tests verify the use of a controlled substance or controlled substance analogue affecting the employee's job performance pursuant to subsections (a), (b) and (c), the commissioner shall be empowered to take appropriate disciplinary action based only upon the employee's job performance and pursuant to title 8, chapter 30. The commissioner shall provide employee counseling and rehabilitation with reasonable accommodation and support of the rehabilitation program. Following successful completion of a rehabilitation program and two (2) years of unimpaired job performance, any reference to testing or rehabilitation shall be expunged from any and all records. Reasonable efforts shall be made to safeguard the privacy of any employee required to enroll in a rehabilitation program.

If the initial or confirmatory test results are negative, any information, including the results of the test, shall be expunged from all files and records after being made available to the tested employee.

The commissioner is responsible for all costs associated with drug tests administered at the request of the department.

Prior to implementation of any testing program, the department shall promulgate a specific, written policy pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, authorizing the tests, procedures, confidentiality and expunction provisions of this section. The policy shall include the requirement that the employee have an opportunity to have an independent analysis of the sample conducted by the laboratory of the employee's choice.

If any employee refuses to submit to the test, the employee shall have the option of entering a rehabilitation program pursuant to subsection (d).

The commissioner shall have the burden of proving that subsections (a)-(h) have been followed.

If any provision of this section is rendered unconstitutional by the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of Tennessee or invalid by the laws of the United States or the laws of the state of Tennessee, the unconstitutional or invalid provision of this section may be deleted by the courts if the deletion will not destroy the integrity, intent or function of this section.

Acts 1988, ch. 905, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-1-122; Acts 2012, ch. 848, § 37.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Controlled substances, title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

Attorney General Opinions. If the Tennessee department of correction elects to implement a drug-free workplace program, it need not comply with this section, OAG 04-019, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/09/04).

If the Tennessee department of correction does not implement the statutory drug-free workplace program, it is prohibited from drug testing of security personnel in the absence of reasonable suspicion; provided such testing comports with federal law, all its employees may be tested randomly for alcohol, and all non-security personnel may be tested randomly for drugs, OAG 04-019, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/09/04).

41-1-122. Chemically dependent county inmates and prisoners — Pilot project — State funds.

Acting in consultation with the commissioner of correction, the board of parole and the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services, the county mayor of any county in this state is authorized to establish a pilot project to provide an intensive program of diagnosis, treatment and rehabilitation for chemically dependent county prisoners and state inmates housed within county correctional facilities. The pilot project shall also provide an intensive program of diagnosis, treatment and rehabilitation for chemically dependent county and state parolees residing within the county. Records shall be maintained to document and evaluate the effectiveness of the pilot project and, to the extent possible, shall include information regarding recidivism among project participants.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary and notwithstanding the fact that state inmates housed within county correctional facilities may participate in programs established pursuant to this section, no state funds shall be obligated or expended to implement this section.

Acts 1991, ch. 427, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 1049, § 54; T.C.A., § 41-1-123; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2010, ch. 1100, § 69; 2012, ch. 575, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2012, ch. 727, § 1 amended § 4-3-104, which concerns name changes of departments and divisions, to provide that references to the board of probation and parole, formerly referred to in subsection (a), are deemed references to the board of parole.

41-1-123. Diversion centers for technical violators.

The department of correction, in cooperation with the board of parole, is authorized to establish a diversion program at one (1) or more locations in the state. The program shall provide a structured environment for selected parole technical violators based upon a therapeutic community model. Participants in the program shall, at a minimum, be required to take part in counseling, educational and other programs as the department deems appropriate, to provide community service and to submit to drug and alcohol screening.

Parole technical violators referred by the board of parole for participation in the diversion program shall not be placed in the program, unless and until the offender has been classified by the department as a suitable candidate for the program, in accordance with policies and guidelines developed jointly by the department and the board.

At its discretion, the department is authorized to operate any program established under this section in conjunction with the special probation technical violator program established under the authority of title 40, chapter 20, part 3.

As used in this section, “parole technical violator” means an offender who has violated the conditions of parole other than by the commission of a new felony offense.

Acts 2006, ch. 666, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Compiler’s Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 727, § 1 amended § 4-3-104, which concerns name changes of departments and divisions, to provide that references to the board of probation and parole, formerly referred to in this section, are deemed references to the board of parole.

Cross-References. Hearings on parole violations, § 40-28-122.

41-1-124. Terms of release of out-of-state prisoner incarcerated in Tennessee.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires, “out-of-state prisoner” means a person incarcerated in a correctional facility within this state on behalf of a state other than Tennessee or a governmental entity whose jurisdiction is outside of Tennessee. “Out-of-state prisoner” does not include a person incarcerated on behalf of an Indian tribe or on behalf of the United States.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commissioner of correction shall not accept an out-of-state prisoner for incarceration within any prison or facility operated by the department unless the sending state contractually agrees to return, and to pay the full costs of returning, the prisoner to the sending state prior to the prisoner's release from incarceration, or arrangements for release in some place other than the sending state are made in accordance with the Interstate Corrections Compact, compiled in chapter 23, part 1 of this title.

Acts 2007, ch. 110, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 110, § 1 provided that subsection (b) is applicable after May 8, 2007.

41-1-125. Local pre-release programs.

The commissioner is authorized to enter into agreements with local governmental entities for the transfer of appropriate department of correction inmates to confinement in a local facility to participate in local pre-release programs. Participation by any county in such a program is voluntary.

No inmate shall be considered for transfer under an agreement authorized by this section unless expiration of the inmate's sentence is anticipated to occur within one (1) year after the transfer, or unless the inmate has been recommended for release on parole by the board of parole.

No inmate shall be considered for transfer under an agreement authorized by this section unless the inmate is considered a nonviolent offender.

The transfer of a department of correction inmate to physical custody in a local facility under this section does not operate to reinvest the trial court with jurisdiction over the manner of the inmate's sentence service. An inmate transferred under this section will be removed from the program and returned to the physical custody of the department at the sole discretion of the department.

Acts 2008, ch. 881, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Compiler’s Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 727, § 1 amended § 4-3-104, which concerns name changes of departments and divisions, to provide that references to the board of probation and parole, formerly referred to in this section, are deemed references to the board of parole.

41-1-126. Validated risk and needs assessment.

As used in this section, “validated risk and needs assessment” means a determination of a person's risk to reoffend and the needs that, when addressed, reduce the risk to reoffend through the use of an actuarial assessment tool that assesses the dynamic and static factors that drive criminal behavior.

The department of correction and community corrections agencies shall perform a validated risk and needs assessment on each felony offender under its supervision or custody upon receipt of the person and at least annually throughout the period of supervision or custody.

The validated risk and needs assessment shall be used by the department, community corrections agencies, the board of parole, and the courts in making decisions and recommendations on programming and treatment options and post-prison supervision conditions for those who have been incarcerated.

Portions of the validated risk and needs assessment shall be shared with community providers upon release, as deemed appropriate by the department, while respecting the privacy rights of the offender.

Acts 2016, ch. 906, § 13.

Compiler’s Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 906, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the Public Safety Act of 2016.

41-1-127. Survey evaluating employment conditions and factors relating to retention of correction officers — Annual report.

In addition to other reports required by this part, the commissioner shall develop and administer a survey of each correction officer who resigns, is terminated, or is transitioned to a position other than correction officer for the purpose of evaluating employment conditions and factors that contribute to or impede the retention of correction officers. The commissioner shall submit an annual report to the governor and the chair of the state and local government committee of the senate and the chair of the state government committee of the house of representatives on or before December 1 on the results of the surveys in a manner that ensures the confidentiality of the name and other personally identifiable information of each correction officer.

Acts 2018, ch. 859, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.